Idaho, session 2025, S1159.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 46-905, Idaho Code, as added in Section 2 of
House Bill No. 206, if enacted by the First Regular Session of the Sixty-
eighth Idaho Legislature, be, and the same is hereby amended to read as fol-
lows:
46-905. USE AND DISTRIBUTION OF EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES FUNDS --
COUNTY ACCOUNTABILITY. (1) The division shall be responsible for distribut-
ing moneys, subject to legislative appropriation, from the emergency med-
ical services vehicle and equipment grant fund created in section 57-830,
Idaho Code, to qualifying nonprofit and governmental entities that submit an
application for a grant from the fund. Grants from the fund may cover the
cost of vehicles and equipment, training, licensing expenses, communica-
tion technology, dispatch services, and costs associated with assuring the
performance of planned coverage and emergency response, including highway
safety and emergency response to motor vehicle accidents.
(a) The division shall approve grants from the fund based on the follow-
ing criteria:
(i) The applicant is a nonprofit or governmental entity that
holds a current license as an ambulance or nontransport service
issued by the division;
(ii) The applicant has demonstrated need based on criteria estab-
lished by the division;
(iii) The applicant has provided verification that it has received
the approval and endorsement of a fire district, city, or county
within its service area;
(iv) The applicant has certified that the title to any vehicle
purchased with funds from the fund shall be in the name of the fire
district, city, or county that endorsed the application and shall
submit proof of titling to the division as soon as practicable; and
(v) The state of Idaho shall retain a security interest in the ve-
hicle to secure the performance of the grant recipient to utilize
the vehicle consistent with the intent described in the applica-
tion.
(b) Notwithstanding the requirements of paragraph (a)(iii) and (iv) of
this subsection, the division is authorized to approve and issue a grant


to an applicant in the absence of an endorsement if the endorsement is
withheld without adequate justification.
(2) The division shall be responsible for distributing moneys, subject
to legislative appropriation, from the emergency medical services fund cre-
ated in section 57-829, Idaho Code. Moneys in the fund shall be used exclu-
sively for costs associated with emergency medical services. However, if
the legislature appropriates moneys to the fund for sustainability grants
to cover personnel and operating costs associated with assuring the sustain-
ability and availability of emergency medical services, applicants may only
be approved by the division subject to the following criteria:
(a) The applicant is a nonprofit or governmental entity that holds a
current emergency medical services agency license issued by the divi-
sion that authorizes the agency as a 911 response agency;
(b) The application clearly defines the applicant's service area spe-
cific to 911 response;
(c) The applicant must certify, if it is eligible to bill for services,
that it has billed health insurance carriers for at least eighty percent
(80%) of eligible billable services it provided in the previous year.
If the applicant is newly licensed and does not have twelve (12) months
of historical billing information, the applicant must certify that it
is currently billing and will continue to bill health insurance carri-
ers for at least eighty percent (80%) of eligible services; and
(d) If the applicant fulfills the requirements of paragraphs (a), (b),
and (c) of this subsection, the county in which the applicant provides
911 response services may, in its discretion, endorse the grant appli-
cation of the requesting entity. A county endorsing an application must
have submitted a plan that has been approved by the division that spec-
ifies how emergency medical services 911 responses shall be covered and
coordinated throughout the entire county.
(3) The provision of emergency medical services is a government func-
tion. If the division approves applications for sustainability grants
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, counties are authorized and re-
quired to ensure that emergency medical services are reasonably available
throughout the county.
(4) It is the intent of the legislature that counties that accept sus-
tainability grants pursuant to subsection (2) of this section use a portion
of the sustainability grant to implement or maintain community health EMS in
the service area.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.